California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
-------------------------------------------

2544.

The department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature not later than July 1, 1976, a priority list of abandoned railroad lines having rights-of-way that may be developed for public transportation uses.

In preparing the list, the department shall consider the State Rail Plan prepared pursuant to Section 7701 of the Public Utilities Code and shall also consult with any city, county, transit district, or regional transportation planning entity within whose boundaries those abandoned railroad lines are located.

The department may consider contributions by local agencies toward the purchase of those rights-of-way as a factor in ranking the rights-of-way on the priority list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 317, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2546.

With money made available for such purpose, the department may acquire any of the rights-of-way included in the priority list prepared pursuant to Section 2544 and shall offer such property to all cities, counties, and transit districts within whose jurisdiction such property is located for development for public transportation purposes. If such public entities indicate an intent to develop such property, the department shall enter into an agreement with them providing for the conveyance of the property for the development of the public transportation use and for such other matters as may be agreed to. If no agreement is reached within three years of the acquisition of the property by the department, such property shall be sold to the highest bidder and the money received shall be deposited in the Abandoned Railroad Account. The department shall acquire the properties in sequence as listed in the priority list unless, for a particular property, the department reasonably determines that (1) the railroad owner is seeking an unreasonably high price for the property; (2) there does not appear to be a public entity willing to enter into an agreement pursuant to this section to develop the property, or (3) the price of the property exceeds the amount of funds available in the Abandoned Railroad Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1098.)
-------------------------------------------

2548.

In the name of the people of the State of California or, upon authorization from a city, county, or transit district, in the name of such city, county, or transit district, the department may condemn for public transportation purposes, under the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to eminent domain, any right-of-way underlying an abandoned railroad line in fee or any lesser interest found by the department to be necessary.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the acquisition of such property is a public necessity and is compatible with the greatest public good and the least private injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

2549.

(a) Any city, county, transit operator, or the department may submit an application to the department for an advance of funds for the purchase of abandoned railroad rights-of-way pursuant to Section 99317 of the Public Utilities Code. The department shall evaluate the applications in accordance with criteria and procedures adopted by the commission and shall submit the applications and its recommendations thereon to the commission not later than February 1 of each year.

(b) The commission shall adopt criteria and procedures for the evaluation of applications by the department. The criteria shall include, but not be limited to all of the following:

(1) The viability of the right-of-way as a transit corridor.

(2) The extent of local financial participation in the acquisition.

(3) The degree to which the unacquired right-of-way is jeopardized by encroaching development.

(c) The commission shall annually adopt a priority list for the advance of funds available for the purpose of this section. The commission shall establish and forward to all applicants a preliminary list at least 30 days prior to the date of a commission hearing on the list. The commission shall adopt the priority list, as proposed or as amended, at a subsequent commission hearing following the initial hearing. The commission shall advance funds available for the purposes of this section in accordance with the adopted priority list.

(d) Any advance of funds pursuant to this section shall be repaid within a three-year period and shall be repaid with interest at a rate equal the interest rate earned on moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1540, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Service Authority for Freeway Emergencies [2550. - 2559.]

2550.

The Legislature declares that its intent in enacting this chapter is to encourage a motorist aid system comprising multiple service elements and infrastructure along the California Freeway and Expressway System to enable motorists in need of aid to obtain assistance. However, it is not intended that a motorist aid system be considered an emergency system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 491, Sec. 1.   (SB 516)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2551.

(a) A service authority for freeway emergencies may be established in any county if the board of supervisors of the county and the city councils of a majority of the cities within the county having a majority of the population of cities within the county adopt resolutions providing for the establishment of the authority.

(b) The resolutions may designate the county transportation commission for the county created pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000)
 of the Public Utilities Code or a council of governments formed pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code) as the service authority for freeway emergencies. The powers of a commission or council of governments so designated are limited to those of the service authority.

(c) The Metropolitan Transportation Commission may function as the service authority for freeway emergencies in any or all of the Counties of Santa Clara, San Mateo, Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Solano,
 Sonoma, and Napa, and the City and County of San Francisco, upon adoption of a resolution by the commission to act as a service authority and upon ratification of the commission’s resolution in a particular county by the board of supervisors of the city and county or by the board of supervisors of the county and by the city councils of the cities within the county having a majority of the population of the cities within the county.

(d) (1) The Sacramento Area Council of Governments may function as the service authority for freeway emergencies in any or all of the Counties of Sacramento, Yolo, Yuba, Sutter, and San Joaquin, or any other county that is not within another multicounty service authority, upon adoption of a resolution by the council to act as a service authority and upon ratification of the resolution in a
 particular county by the board of supervisors of the county and by the city councils of the cities within the county having a majority of the population of the cities within the county.

(2) The Sacramento Area Council of Governments may also exercise, as a service authority, in any of those counties, the powers specified in Section 891.5 pertaining to callboxes on class 1 bikeways.

(e) The Imperial County Transportation Commission may function as the service authority for freeway emergencies in the County of Imperial pursuant to Section 132822 of the Public Utilities Code upon adoption of a resolution by the commission to act as a
 service authority and upon ratification of the resolution by the board of supervisors of the county and by the city councils of the cities within the county having a majority of the population of the cities within the county.

(f) As used in this chapter, “authority” and “service authority” mean a service authority for freeway emergencies created pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 11, Sec. 3.   (AB 335)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2551.5.

The board of supervisors, and the city councils of the cities in the county, may authorize the members of the service authority to receive for each attendance at meetings of the service authority, and for each day any member is engaged in authorized service authority business other than attendance at meetings of the service authority, the maximum sum of one hundred dollars ($100), but not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in any calendar month, and to be allowed their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1132, Sec. 3.5.   Effective September 22, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

2551.6.

A service authority may agree to operate the freeway service patrol in the county or region in which the service authority was created. If another agency is operating a freeway service patrol in the county or region, the service authority shall obtain approval from that agency before operating the freeway service patrol.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 374, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2552.

When the Metropolitan Transportation Commission or the Sacramento Area Council of Governments functions as the service authority for two or more counties, the revenues which it receives pursuant to Section 9250.10 of the Vehicle Code, after retention of amounts necessary to reimburse the commission or the council for its reasonable and necessary administrative costs, shall be expended for implementation, maintenance, and operation of a motorist aid system within those counties. The amount expended for each of those counties shall be in the same proportion as the revenues generated within the county bears to the total revenues received by the commission or the council. Expenditures may be made in a county in addition to revenues proportionately generated if the expenditures are approved by all of the donor county representatives on the service authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 549, Sec. 2.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

2553.

An authority, other than the Metropolitan Transportation Commission or a county transportation commission or a council of governments designated pursuant to Section 2551, shall have seven members, with two members selected by the board of supervisors and five members selected jointly by the city councils of cities within the county.

 If the Metropolitan Transportation Commission functions as a service authority, it shall consist of all the members of the commission as set forth in Section 66503 of the Government Code. 

If the Sacramento Area Council of Governments functions as a service authority, it shall consist of (a) all of the members of the board of directors of the council, as set forth in the Joint Powers Agreement of the Sacramento Area Council of Governments, dated October 21, 1980, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, (b) one member representing San Joaquin County, (c) one member representing the cities of San Joaquin County, (d) one member representing any other county that is not already a member of the council, and (e) one member representing the cities within that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2554.

An authority may contract and may undertake any act convenient or necessary to carry out this chapter and any other law relating to the authority.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2552 by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1132, Sec. 6.   Effective September 22, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

2555.

An authority may impose a fee of one dollar ($1) per year, on vehicles registered in the county pursuant to Section 9250.10 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 766, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2555.1.

(a) On January 1, 2013, the service authority created in the County of San Diego shall be dissolved, and, notwithstanding Section 2551, SANDAG shall become the successor to the dissolved service authority and assume the remaining responsibilities for all operational, administrative, and maintenance tasks for the callbox system. SANDAG shall post its detailed budget relative to the revenue received from the collection of fees pursuant to Section 9250.10 of the Vehicle Code, and the expenditures of these funds, on its Internet Web site.

(b) Any reserves in excess of four million dollars ($4,000,000) held by the authority on the date that the act adding this section becomes
 effective shall be distributed to cities in the County of San Diego, and to the county with respect to the unincorporated area of the county, in proportion to fees paid pursuant to Section 2555 in the 2010–11 fiscal year by residents of each city and the unincorporated area. SANDAG, as the successor authority, shall distribute the funds on or before March 31, 2013. The distributed funds shall be used by the recipient jurisdictions in compliance with the provisions of Section 2557.

(c) The authority shall develop a plan in consultation with SANDAG for transitioning its responsibilities to SANDAG during the transition period between the effective date of the act adding this section and January 1, 2013. During the transition period, the authority
 shall not expend any funds or enter into any contracts without written approval from SANDAG.

(d) SANDAG as the successor authority may continue to fund police, fire, and rescue helicopter programs consistent with the provisions of Section 2557.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 299, Sec. 1.   (AB 1572)   Effective September 13, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2556.

An existing service authority established by any of the counties or the city and county enumerated in subdivision (c) of Section 2551 may be merged into a service authority established by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission or by the Sacramento Area Council of Governments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 549, Sec. 4.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

2557.

(a) Each service authority shall determine how moneys received by it pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9250.10 of the Vehicle Code shall be used for the implementation, maintenance, and operation of a motorist aid system, including the lease or lease-purchase of facilities and equipment for the system, on the portions of the California Freeway and Expressway System and a county expressway system, and the unincorporated county roads in that county, and on state highway routes that
 connect segments of these systems, that are located within the county in which the authority is established. The department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall each review and approve plans, pursuant to the “CHP/Caltrans Call Box and Motorist Aid Guidelines,” referenced in Section 2421.5 of the Vehicle Code, for implementation of a motorist aid system of call boxes proposed for any state highway route and shall be reimbursed by the service authority for all costs incurred due to review and approval of the plan.

(b) An authority or any other public entity may construct and maintain, and lease or lease-purchase on terms and conditions it deems appropriate, the facilities of a motorist aid system or it may contract with a private person or entity to do so.

(c) If leases or lease-purchase agreements are entered into pursuant to subdivision (a), or if revenue bonds are issued and sold pursuant to Section 2558, the moneys received by each service authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9250.10 of the Vehicle Code shall be used to the extent necessary to make lease payments or to pay the principal of, and interest on, the amount of bonded indebtedness outstanding, as the case may be. Facilities and equipment acquired through the expenditure of proceeds from the sale of those bonds shall have a useful life at least equal to the term of the bonds.

(d) (1) Any moneys received and allocated by a service authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9250.10 of the Vehicle Code may be used for purposes of paragraph (2) and for full implementation and ongoing
 costs to maintain and operate the motorist aid system pursuant to subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, the following motorist aid and safety-related projects:

(A) Call boxes.

(B) Changeable message signs.

(C) Lighting for call boxes.

(D) Support for traffic operations centers.

(E) Contracting for removal of disabled vehicles from the traveled portion of the right-of-way, including operation of the freeway service patrol pursuant to Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 2560).

(F) Traveler information systems, Intelligent
 Transportation System architecture and infrastructure, and other transportation demand management services.

(G) Safety-related hazard and obstruction removal.

(2) Any amendment to an existing plan for a motorist aid system of call boxes adopted by a service authority for any state highway route shall, prior to implementation, be submitted to the department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol for review and approval, and shall not be implemented until so reviewed and approved pursuant to the “CHP/Caltrans Call Box and Motorist Aid Guidelines,” referenced in Section 2421.5 of the Vehicle Code. The service authority shall reimburse each department for the costs of that review.

(3) Service authority
 funding provided for projects described in subparagraphs (B),(F), and (G) of paragraph (1) is intended to supplement, and not replace, department expenditures for similar infrastructure and services on the California Freeway and Expressway System.

(e) A service authority may develop policies for the retention of records, including, but not limited to, authority operations, contracts, and programs, and the length of the retention period.

(f) A motorist aid system constructed, maintained, or operated pursuant to this section shall meet the applicable standards of Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336) and federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(g) Nothing in this section relieves a service authority of any obligation under the law to receive appropriate permission or approval from the department for activities within rights-of-way under the jurisdiction of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 491, Sec. 2.   (SB 516)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2558.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a service authority may issue revenue bonds pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4950) of Part 3 of Division 5 of the Health and Safety Code, as nearly as practicable, for the implementation and maintenance of a motorist aid program and shall pledge revenues to be received from fees referred to in Section 2555 as security for the payment of principal or of interest or other amounts due on those revenue bonds. In addition, a service authority that has entered into one or more leases or lease-purchase agreements for facilities of a motorist aid program may also pledge, as security for the payment of amounts due under the leases or agreements, revenues to be received from those fees. The pledge of revenues provided for in this subdivision shall be a first and prior lien and, without any action other than the adoption by the members of a resolution providing for the pledge, the lien of the pledge shall attach and become perfected as to each fee imposed pursuant to Section 9250.10 of the Vehicle Code as and when the fee becomes due and payable. However, if a service authority has, at the same time, existing obligations under one or more issues of revenue bonds, one or more leases or lease-purchase agreements, or both, the respective priorities of the liens of pledges of revenue shall be determined on the basis of the respective dates on which resolutions providing for those pledges were adopted, with the highest priority being accorded the pledge of revenues provided for in the earliest of those resolutions. Bond proceeds shall not be used for operation of a motorist aid system of call boxes.

(b) A service authority may issue revenue bonds for each county within its jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2559.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to remove, damage, interfere with the use of, or obstruct any motorist aid call box provided pursuant to this chapter without the consent of the authority.

A person convicted under this section may be required by the court to pay to the service authority the costs of repairing or replacing the call box, in addition to any other penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1132, Sec. 11.   Effective September 22, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Freeway Service Patrols [2560. - 2565.]

2560.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Freeway Service Patrol Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1109, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

2560.5.

(a) The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the implementation of a freeway service patrol system using a formula-based allocation, referred to as baseline funding allocation, to all eligible regional and local agencies for traffic-congested urban freeways throughout the state, involving a cooperative effort between state and local agencies. All regional or local agency programs that meet the minimum eligibility requirements set forth in this section and Section 2562.1 shall receive initial funding from the baseline funding allocation. 

(b) In addition to the formula-based allocation program established, subject to funds being appropriated in the annual Budget Act, in subdivision (a), there is hereby established a Competitive Freeway Service Patrol Grant Program to provide funding of a freeway service patrol system to reduce traffic congestion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2561.

As used in this chapter, each of the following terms has the following meaning:

(a) “Emergency roadside assistance” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2436 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) “Employer” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2430.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) “Freeway service patrol” means a program managed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the department, and a regional or local entity which provides emergency roadside assistance on a freeway in an urban area.

(d) “Regional or local entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2430.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(e) “Tow truck driver” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2430.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1109, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

2561.3.

The freeway service patrol in any particular area shall be operated pursuant to an agreement between the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the department, and the appropriate regional or local entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 578, Sec. 2.   Effective September 16, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2561.5.

(a) Funding for the freeway service patrols established pursuant to this chapter shall be provided, upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act, from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund. In addition, the appropriate regional or local entity shall ensure that local resources are expended on freeway service patrols in an amount not less than 25 percent of the amount provided from the State Highway Account.

(b) In locations where a freeway service patrol exists, the department shall coordinate and integrate the funds appropriated pursuant to this section into the existing program. In the allocation of these funds, no local entity may be penalized for having an existing freeway service patrol program.

(c) No state funding may be released prior to the execution of the agreement developed under Section 2561.3.

(d) No program funded under this chapter may supplant emergency response towing services provided by the department as of January 1, 1992.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that funding provided under subdivision (a) of Section 2560.5 be consistent from year to year in order to facilitate the awarding of multiyear contracts between participating regional and local entities and providers of freeway patrol services. The department shall only recognize multiyear contract commitments equal to or less than three years. If new freeway service patrol regional or local entity programs are added to the baseline funding allocation, as described in Section 2560.5, those programs shall be phased in so as not to impact the multiyear contract commitments. However, once a new application from an eligible regional or local entity is submitted and approved, the share of the baseline funding allocation to the regional or local agency shall be phased in within three years of the date the application is approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2562.1.

(a) Funding for the program established in subdivision (a) of Section 2560.5 in a participating area shall be based 25 percent on the number of urban freeway lane miles in the participating area to the total number of freeway lane miles in all the participating areas, 50 percent on the basis of the ratio of the population of the participating area to the total population of all the participating areas, and 25 percent on the basis of traffic congestion as ascertained by the department pursuant to the most recent Statewide Highway Traffic Congestion Monitoring Program. A regional or local agency submitting an application after July 1, 2003, for funding shall demonstrate in the application an overall benefit-cost ratio of 3 to 1. The department shall determine the benefit-cost ratio methodology.

(b) If a regional or local agency submits an application for funding that is approved by the department before December 31 of any year and additional funding is not provided to the baseline funding allocation, the department shall allocate the funding allocation at a maximum over three years as follows:

(1) Thirty-three and three-tenths percent of the total amount of the allocation during the immediately following fiscal year.

(2) Sixty-six and six-tenths percent of the total amount of the allocation during the fiscal year that immediately follows the fiscal year described in paragraph (1).

(3) One hundred percent of the total amount of the allocation during the fiscal year that immediately follows the fiscal year described in paragraph (2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 638, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2562.2.

(a) Not later than 90 days after the effective date of this section, the department shall prepare guidelines for the implementation of a Competitive Freeway Service Patrol Grant Program and shall submit those guidelines to each regional or local agency operating a freeway service patrol. Not later than 30 days after receipt of the guidelines, the regional or local agency shall submit its written comments to the department.

(b) Not later than 150 days after the effective date of this section, the department shall publish the final guidelines for the Competitive Freeway Service Patrol Grant Program and commence implementation of the program. The guidelines shall not constitute a regulation for the purposes of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) The guidelines prepared pursuant to this section shall comply with the following requirements:

(1) Grants to be awarded to a regional or local agency applicant on a competitive basis for contracting with an employer for the provision of a new or expanded freeway service patrol service and for contracting with the Department of the California Highway Patrol for the provision of only direct supervisory services warranted by workload standards to reduce traffic congestion.

(2) The grant to require a matching share by the regional or local agency equaling not less than 25 percent of the amount provided from the State Highway Account.

(3) The grant to be awarded on the basis of project need and effectiveness calculated on a cost benefit analysis.

(4) The amount of a grant to be made to a regional or local agency shall not exceed 35 percent of the total amount of the available grant funds.

(5) The regional or local agency demonstrates that the services it proposes to fund with the grant are new freeway service patrol services that were not previously provided in its jurisdiction.

(6) The regional or local agency demonstrates its ability to support and supervise the new or expanded services provided by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(d) This section shall be operative only if funds are appropriated for its purposes in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 578, Sec. 5.   Effective September 16, 2002.   Applicability contingent upon funding, pursuant to subd. (d).)
-------------------------------------------

2562.3.

In determining the baseline annual funding allocation, regional or local entities shall apply to the department in accordance with operational standards as outlined in the program guidelines and in accordance with the eligibility requirements described in Sections 2561.5 and 2562.1. A regional or local entity that meets the eligibility requirements may not be denied its fair share of the baseline annual allocation made by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 638, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2562.5.

Each tow truck participating in a freeway service patrol shall bear a logo comprised of, at a minimum, a circle, a triangle, and a tow truck silhouette, with the words “Freeway Service Patrol,” which identifies the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the department, and, at the option of the entity, the participating regional or local entity. Participating regional or local entities may place an approved logo on participating tow trucks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 513, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2563.

Tow truck drivers and employers participating in a freeway service patrol pursuant to this chapter are subject to the standards and qualifications established under Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 2430) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 513, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2564.

Not more than 2 percent of the state funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter shall be used for administrative overhead expenses or purposes by state agencies. No state funds shall be used for administrative purposes by the participating local and regional entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 513, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2565.

The department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and participating and eligible regional and local entities shall develop and periodically update guidelines for program operations, as those guidelines and updates may be required. The guidelines shall address operational requirements only and may not prevent a regional or local entity from entering the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 638, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15.5. Vanpool Financing [2570. - 2580.]

2570.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the meanings given in this section:

(a) “Vanpool operator” means any person who files an application and who is approved for a loan or grant under this chapter.

(b) “Vanpool vehicle” means, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a motor vehicle designed for carrying more than six but less than 16 persons, including the driver, which is maintained and used primarily for the work-related transportation of adults for the purpose of ridesharing.

(c) “Useful life,” with respect to a vanpool vehicle, means either 100,000 miles and four years old or 200,000 miles without regard to age.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2571.

The Ridesharing Vanpool Revolving Loan and Grant Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The fund shall be administered by the department for purposes of making loans and grants to vanpool operators. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money in the fund is continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2572.

Any person may submit an application to the department for a loan from the fund to purchase a vanpool vehicle for operation by the person as a vanpool operator. Title to the vehicle shall be retained by the department until the loan is repaid in full. The loan shall be repaid over a period of time not to exceed the vehicle’s useful life. Once the loan is repaid in full, title to the vehicle shall be transferred to the vanpool operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2573.

The department shall charge a rate of interest for loans made under this chapter reasonably calculated to ultimately keep the fund at a constant level and in addition recover the administrative costs incurred by the department under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2574.

The vanpool grant program shall be administered by the department. From funds appropriated to the department for the purpose, the department shall make grants to persons approved as vanpool operators for the purchase or lease of vanpool vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2575.

(a) Any person may submit an application to the department for a grant of not more than 70 percent of the cost to purchase or lease a new vanpool vehicle or vehicles.

(b) A vanpool operator who receives a purchase grant shall operate the vanpool vehicle as a vanpool for the useful life of the vehicle. The vanpool operator’s failure to do so shall result in a forfeiture of the grant, the return of the vanpool vehicle to the department, and forfeiture of the operator’s contribution toward the purchase price of the vehicle.

(c) Title to the vanpool vehicle shall be retained by the department until the expiration of the vehicle’s useful life. Once the vanpool vehicle’s useful life has been reached, title to the vehicle shall be transferred to the vanpool operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2576.

A vanpool operator who receives a lease grant shall operate the vanpool vehicle as a vanpool for the duration of the lease. The vanpool operator’s failure to do so shall result in a forfeiture of all rights under the lease, the return of the vanpool vehicle to the lessor, and forfeiture of the operator’s contribution toward the lease of the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2577.

All money received by the department under this chapter shall be deposited in the Ridesharing Vanpool Revolving Loan and Grant Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2578.

(a) The department shall adopt guidelines for the making of loans and for the purchase and lease of vanpool vehicles. The guidelines shall, in the case of loans, include, but not be limited to, a procedure to evaluate the vanpool operator’s ability to repay the loan in a timely fashion, as well as the need for the vanpool vehicle and other criteria for selecting applicants. The department shall assign priority in the following descending order:

(1) Vanpools operating on routes with no alternative public transportation.

(2) Vanpool operators applying for loans or grants for new vanpool vehicles. 

(3) Applicants having previous successful experience as vanpool operators.

(4) Vanpool operators applying for loans or grants for replacement vanpool vehicles. For purposes of this paragraph, the vanpool vehicle to be replaced shall be at least four years old or have operated 250,000 or more miles, or both.

(b) Concurrently with the award of each loan or grant, the department shall require each applicant to comply with subdivision (h) of Section 12804 of the Vehicle Code and Section 34509 of the Vehicle Code, and the insurance coverage requirements of the department. The guidelines shall also set forth the limitations on the nonwork-trip use of the vanpool vehicle, the maximum percentage of the cost of a vanpool vehicle which may be covered by a loan or grant under this chapter, and other requirements determined to be necessary by the department.

(c) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the adoption of the guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2579.

A vanpool operator is not eligible for any California income tax deduction or credit applicable to vanpooling with respect to the amount of any grant under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2580.

(a) The Department of Transportation may make loans to other state agencies for the purpose of purchasing vanpool vehicles, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 2570, for state employee vanpooling. The purchased vehicles, to the extent practicable, shall be either “low-emission vehicles,” as defined by Section 39037.05 of the Health and Safety Code, or “alternative fuel vehicles,” which are either of the following:

(1) An original equipment manufactured vehicle capable of operating on a nonpetroleum-based alternative fuel such as electricity, ethanol, hydrogen, liquefied petroleum gas, methanol, or natural gas and that has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the State Air Resources Board the ability to meet applicable California emission standards.
